Rhode Island, session 2025, SB383.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30-15-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 30-15 entitled "Emergency
Management" is hereby amended to read as follows:
30-15-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Bioterrorism” means the intentional use of any microorganism, virus, infectious
substance or biological product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology or any naturally
occurring or bioengineered component of any such microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or
biological product, to cause death, disease, or other biological malfunction in a human, an animal,
a plant or other living organism;
(2) "Director" means the director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency;
(2)(3) “Disaster” means occurrence or imminent threat of widespread or severe damage,
injury, or loss of life or property resulting from any natural or man-made cause, including, but not
limited to:
(i) Fire;
(ii) Flood;
(iii) Earthquake;
(iv) Wind, storm, wave action, oil spill, or other water contamination requiring emergency
action to avert danger or damage;
(v) Volcanic activity;

(vi) Epidemic;
(vii) Air contamination;
(viii) Blight;
(ix) Drought;
(x) Infestation;
(xi) Explosion;
(xii) Riots;
(xiii) Hostile military or paramilitary action;
(xiv) Endangerment of the health, safety, or resources of the people of the state;
(xv) Acts of bioterrorism;
(3)(4) “Political subdivision” means any city or town in Rhode Island; and
(4)(5) “Unorganized militia” means all able-bodied persons between the ages of sixteen
(16) and fifty (50) years.
SECTION 2. Chapter 30-15 of the General Laws entitled "Emergency Management" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
30-15-5.1. Flood insurance.
The director and the commerce commission shall develop and implement a plan to assist
businesses in obtaining flood insurance through the National Flood Insurance program.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002132
========
LC002132 - Page 2 of 3